Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8613
Annual report.

The
commission shall file an annual report with the Governor and the Clerk of
the Legislature, prior to each regular session of the Legislature, which details
the activities and expenditures of the commission and shall include separately
information related to the activities and expenditures of the vending facility
program as well as estimates of anticipated expenditures and anticipated revenue
available to the vending facility program from all sources. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall
be submitted electronically.

Laws 2000, LB 352, § 13;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 127.